Arkansas, session 2025, SB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-85-714(b)(1), concerning when a no
contact order is issued in a criminal case, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) A court may issue a no contact order under this section in
addition to any other condition of release from custody that is imposed by
the court if:
(A)(i) The defendant is charged with one (1) or more
of the following offenses:
(i)(a) Terroristic threatening, § 5-13-301; or
*CEB071*
03/11/2025 1:13:29 PM CEB071

SB429
(ii) Trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103; or
(iii)(b) False imprisonment in the first
degree, § 5-11-103; or
(B)(ii) It appears that there exists a danger that a
defendant will:
(i)(a) Commit a serious crime;
(ii)(b) Seek to intimidate a witness; or
(iii)(c) Otherwise unlawfully interfere with
the orderly administration of justice.
(B) The court shall issue a no contact order under this
section in addition to any other condition of release from custody that is
imposed by the court if the defendant is charged with an offense under the
Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1101 is amended to read as follows:
16-90-1101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Crime” means an act or omission committed by a person,
whether or not competent or an adult, which is punishable by incarceration if
committed by a competent adult;
(2) "Human trafficking offense" means an offense under the Human
Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.;
(2)(3) “Member of the victim's family” means the spouse, a child
by birth or adoption, a stepchild, a parent, a stepparent, a sibling, or an
individual designated by the victim or by a court in which the crime is being
or could be prosecuted, but does not include an individual who is accountable
for the crime or a crime arising from the same conduct, criminal episode, or
plan;
(3)(4) “Offense against a victim who is a minor” means:
(A) Kidnapping pursuant to § 5-11-102(a)(4) when the
victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim;
(B) False imprisonment in the first degree pursuant to §
5-11-103 when the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the
victim;
(C) Permanent detention or restraint pursuant to § 5-11-
106 when the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the
03/11/2025 1:13:29 PM CEB071

SB429
victim;
(D) Any sex offense when the victim is a minor;
(E) Any human trafficking offense when the victim is a
minor;
(E)(F) An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit
any of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (3)(4);
(F)(G) An adjudication of guilt for an offense of the law
of another state, for a federal offense, or for a military offense, which is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this
subdivision (3)(4); or
(G)(H) A violation of any former law of this state that is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this
subdivision (3)(4);
(4)(5) “Person” means an individual, corporation, estate, trust,
partnership, association, joint venture, governmental entity, agency, or
instrumentality, or any other legal entity;
(5)(6) “Representative of the victim” means a member of the
victim's family or an individual designated by the victim or by a court in
which the crime is being or could be prosecuted;
(6)(7) “Sex offense” means:
(A) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(B) Sexual indecency with a child, § 5-14-110, if the
offense is a felony;
(C) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(D) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(E) Sexual assault in the third degree, § 5-14-126;
(F) Sexual assault in the fourth degree, § 5-14-127;
(G) Incest, § 5-26-202;
(H) Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use
in visual or print medium, § 5-27-303;
(I) Transportation of minors for prohibited sexual
conduct, § 5-27-305;
(J) Employing or consenting to use of a child in sexual
performance, § 5-27-402;
(K) Producing, directing, or promoting a sexual
performance by a child, § 5-27-403;
03/11/2025 1:13:29 PM CEB071

SB429
(L) Possession or use of child sexual abuse material, § 5-
27-603;
(M) Computer exploitation of a child in the first degree,
§ 5-27-605(a);
(N) Promoting prostitution in the first degree, § 5-70-
104;
(O) Stalking, § 5-71-229;
(P) An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any
of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (6)(7);
(Q) An adjudication of guilt for an offense of the law of
another state, for a federal offense, or for a military offense, which is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this
subdivision (6)(7);
(R) A violation of any former law of this state that is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this
subdivision (6)(7); or
(S) Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113;
(7)(8) “State” means a state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;
(8)(9)(A) “Victim” means a victim of a:
(i) A sex offense;
(ii) or an An offense against a victim who is a
minor;
(iii) and a victim of any A violent crime, but; or
(iv) A human trafficking offense.
(B) "Victim" does not include a:
(i) person Person who is accountable for the crime or
a crime arising from the same conduct, criminal episode, or plan; or and does
not include a governmental
(ii) Governmental entity; and
(9)(10) “Violent crime” means any felony or Class A misdemeanor
which resulted in physical injury to the victim, any felony or Class A
misdemeanor involving the use of a deadly weapon, terroristic threatening in
the first degree, § 5-13-301(a), and stalking, as defined in § 5-71-229.

03/11/2025 1:13:29 PM CEB071

SB429
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1412 is amended to read as follows:
16-90-1412. Sealing certain convictions for victims of human
trafficking — Definition.
(a) As used in this section,:
(1) "Minor" means a person younger than eighteen (18) years of
age; and
(2) “victim Victim of human trafficking” means a person who has
been subjected to trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103, or any former law of
this state, law of another state, or federal law that is substantially
similar.
(b)(1) A person convicted of prostitution, § 5-70-102, may file a
uniform petition to seal the a conviction under this section if it :
(A) The conviction was obtained as a result of the
person's having been a victim of human trafficking at the time of the
offense; and
(B) The person was:
(i) A minor when the offense was committed; or
(ii) Eighteen (18) years of age or older when the
offense was committed and the conviction was for the offense of prostitution,
§ 5-70-102.
(2) A uniform petition under this section may be filed at any
time and may be filed for a conviction imposed at any time.
(c) The court shall grant the uniform petition under this section if
it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) The petitioner was: convicted
(A) Convicted of prostitution, § 5-70-102, and the offense
was committed when the petitioner was eighteen (18) years of age or older;
and or
(B) A minor when the offense was committed; and
(2)(A) The conviction was obtained as a result of the
petitioner's having been a victim of human trafficking at the time of the
offense.
(B) A finding concerning the affirmative defense under §
5-2-210 does not affect a finding under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this
section, and the petitioner is not required to have raised the affirmative
defense under § 5-2-210.
03/11/2025 1:13:29 PM CEB071

SB429
(d) If the uniform petition under this section is granted, the court
shall:
(1) Issue a uniform order to seal the conviction; and
(2) With respect to the conviction for prostitution, § 5-70-102,
redact the petitioner's name from all records and files related to the
petitioner's:
(A) Arrest;
(B) Citation;
(C) Criminal investigation;
(D) Criminal charge;
(E) Adjudication of guilt;
(F) Criminal proceedings; and
(G) Probation for the offense.
(e)(1) Official documentation by a federal, state, or local government
agency verifying that at the time of the conviction for prostitution, § 5-70-
102 offense, the petitioner was a victim of human trafficking creates a
presumption under this section that the person's prostitution conviction was
obtained as a result of having been a victim of human trafficking at the time
of the offense.
(2) Documentation under this subsection is not required to grant
a petition under this section.
(3) Documentation under this subsection may include without
limitation:
(A) Certified records of federal or state court
proceedings that demonstrate that the defendant was a victim of a trafficker
charged with a trafficking offense under state law or the Victims of
Trafficking and Violence Protection Act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. § 7101 et seq., as
it existed on January 1, 2013; or
(B) Certified records of “approval notices” or “law
enforcement certifications” generated from federal immigration proceedings
available to victims of human trafficking.





03/11/2025 1:13:29 PM CEB071